District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Moped Registration Accountability Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Automobile Consumer Protection Act of 1984, effective March 14, 1985
(D.C. Law 5-162, D.C. Official Code § 50-501 et seq) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(9) (D.C. Official Code § 50-501(9)) is amended to read as follows:
“(9) “Motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, including motorcycles and motor-driven
cycles, manufactured for sale, offered for sale, sold, or registered in the District and which is
designed for the primary purpose of transporting a driver and 1 or more passengers on streets,
roads, or highways. The term “motor vehicle” shall not include buses sold for public
transportation, motor homes, or motorized recreational vehicles.”.


(b) Section 6(a) (D.C. Official Code § 50-505) is amended by adding a paragraph (3) to
read as follows:
“(3) Written notice to the prospective consumer of the motor vehicle’s
classification pursuant to the District’s laws, rules, and regulations, and all requirements,
including vehicle registration, that are necessary to legally operate the motor vehicle in the
District.”.
Sec. 3. Section 4(a) of the District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, approved August
17, 1937 (50 Stat. 680; D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.04(a)), is amended by adding a new
paragraph (5) to read as follows:
“(5) For any rental operator who is engaged in the business of renting motorcycles
or motor-driven cycles:
“(A) To complete a rental transaction of a vehicle that does not fulfill all
registration and vehicle identification requirements; or,
“(B) To affix false identifying information to a rental vehicle, including
motor type, piston or rotor displacement or its equivalent, or maximum speed.”.
Sec. 4. The Rental Vehicle Tax Reform Act of 1978, effective March 6, 1979 (D.C. Law
2-157; D.C. Official Code § 50-1505.01 et seq.),
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1505.01), is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “motorcycles,”.
(2) New subsections (j) and (k) are added to read as follows:
“(j) "Motorcycle" shall have the same meaning as provided in 18 DCMR § 9901.1.
“(k) "Motor-driven cycle" shall have the same meaning as provided in 18 DCMR §
9901.1.”.


(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1505.03) is amended by adding a new subsection
(d) to read as follows:
“(d) Motorcycles and motor-driven cycles. – A rental operator who is engaged in the
business of renting motorcycles or motor-driven cycles shall register all rental vehicles in its
rental fleet.”.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.